Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.120

Levy of assessment—Collections—Federal orders—Commission meetings.

(1) There is hereby levied an assessment of up to $2.50 per head to be implemented as prescribed in subsection (2) of this section on all Washington cattle sold in this state or elsewhere to be paid by the seller at the time of sale: PROVIDED, That if such sale is accompanied by a brand inspection by the department such an assessment may be collected at the same time, place and in the same manner as brand inspection fees. Such fees may be collected by the livestock identification program of the department and transmitted to the commission: PROVIDED FURTHER, That, if such sale is made without a brand inspection by the department the assessment shall be paid by the seller and transmitted directly to the commission by the 15th day of the month following the month the transaction occurred.

(2)(a) Beginning July 1, 2024, the assessment must be $1.50 per head. $0.50 of the $1.50 assessment levied under this subsection may not be collected at the first point of sale of any calf identified with a green tag as identified in RCW 16.57.160.

(b) Beginning January 1, 2025, the assessment must be $2.00 per head. $1.00 of the $2.00 assessment levied under this subsection may not be collected at the first point of sale of any calf identified with a green tag as identified in RCW 16.57.160.

(c) Beginning January 1, 2026, the assessment must be $2.50 per head. $1.50 of the $2.50 assessment levied under this subsection may not be collected at the first point of sale of any calf identified with a green tag as identified in RCW 16.57.160.

(3) The procedures for collecting all state and federal assessments under this chapter shall be as required by the federal order and as described by rules adopted by the commission.

(4) The commission shall hold meetings in different geographic regions of the state throughout the year, with at least two meetings held east of the crest of the Cascade mountains. Geographic regions must include the northeast, southeast, central southwest, and northwest regions of the state.

[ 2024 c 155 s 1; 2002 c 313 s 83; 2000 c 146 s 5; 1987 c 393 s 11; 1986 c 190 s 2; 1982 c 47 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 93 s 1; 1969 c 133 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.